Illinois, session 104th, HB3310.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/203)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-203)7    Sec. 203. Base income defined. 8    (a) Individuals.9        (1) In general. In the case of an individual, base 10    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's adjusted 11    gross income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph 12    (2).13        (2) Modifications. The adjusted gross income referred 14    to in paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto 15    the sum of the following amounts:16            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 17        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 18        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 19        in the computation of adjusted gross income, except 20        stock dividends of qualified public utilities 21        described in Section 305(e) of the Internal Revenue 22        Code;23            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by   HB3310- 2 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 2        the computation of adjusted gross income for the 3        taxable year;4            (C) An amount equal to the amount received during 5        the taxable year as a recovery or refund of real 6        property taxes paid with respect to the taxpayer's 7        principal residence under the Revenue Act of 1939 and 8        for which a deduction was previously taken under 9        subparagraph (L) of this paragraph (2) prior to July 10        1, 1991, the retrospective application date of Article 11        4 of Public Act 87-17. In the case of multi-unit or 12        multi-use structures and farm dwellings, the taxes on 13        the taxpayer's principal residence shall be that 14        portion of the total taxes for the entire property 15        which is attributable to such principal residence;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of adjusted gross income;20            (D-5) An amount, to the extent not included in 21        adjusted gross income, equal to the amount of money 22        withdrawn by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a 23        medical care savings account and the interest earned 24        on the account in the taxable year of a withdrawal 25        pursuant to subsection (b) of Section 20 of the 26        Medical Care Savings Account Act or subsection (b) of   HB3310- 3 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        Section 20 of the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2        2000;3            (D-10) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the individual deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the individual 7        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;8            (D-15) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 9        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 10        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 11        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 12        the Internal Revenue Code;13            (D-16) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 14        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 15        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 16        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 17        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 18        deductions taken in all taxable years under 19        subparagraph (Z) with respect to that property.20            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 21        the last day of the last tax year for which a 22        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 23        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 24        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 25        modification under subparagraph (Z), then an amount 26        equal to that subtraction modification.   HB3310- 4 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 2        modification under this subparagraph only once with 3        respect to any one piece of property;4            (D-17) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 5        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 6        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 7        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 9        member of the same unitary business group but for the 10        fact that foreign person's business activity outside 11        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 12        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 13        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 14        who would be a member of the same unitary business 15        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 16        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 17        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 18        required to apportion business income under different 19        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 20        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 21        extent that dividends were included in base income of 22        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 23        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 24        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 25        included in gross income under Sections 951 through 26        964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts included   HB3310- 5 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        in gross income under Section 78 of the Internal 2        Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of the same 3        person to whom the interest was paid, accrued, or 4        incurred.5            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 6                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 7            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 8            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 9            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 10            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 11            with respect to such interest; or12                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 15            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 16            following:17                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 18                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 19                to a person that is not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 22                person did not have as a principal purpose the 23                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 24                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 25                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 26                terms; or   HB3310- 6 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 2            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 3            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 4            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 5            and terms and the principal purpose for the 6            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 7            or 8                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 9            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 10            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 11            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 12            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 13            to the application or use of an alternative method 14            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 15                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 16            Director from making any other adjustment 17            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 18            for any tax year beginning after the effective 19            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 20            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 21            Department and such regulations provide methods 22            and standards by which the Department will utilize 23            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 24            (D-18) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 25        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 26        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or   HB3310- 7 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 3        foreign person who would be a member of the same 4        unitary business group but for the fact that the 5        foreign person's business activity outside the United 6        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 7        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 9        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 10        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 11        from being included in the unitary business group 12        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 13        business income under different subsections of Section 14        304. The addition modification required by this 15        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 16        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 17        group for the same taxable year and received by the 18        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 19        business group (including amounts included in gross 20        income under Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal 21        Revenue Code and amounts included in gross income 22        under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) with 23        respect to the stock of the same person to whom the 24        intangible expenses and costs were directly or 25        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 26        sentence does not apply to the extent that the same   HB3310- 8 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 2        modification required under Section 203(a)(2)(D-17) of 3        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 4        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 5        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 6        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 7        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 8        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 9        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 10        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 11        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 12        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 13        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 14        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 15        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 16        similar types of intangible assets.17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:18                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 19            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 20            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 21            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 22            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 23            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 24            with respect to such item; or25                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 26            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or   HB3310- 9 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 2            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 3            following:4                    (a) the person during the same taxable 5                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 6                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 7                not a related member, and8                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 9                intangible expense or cost between the 10                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 11                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 12                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 13                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 14                or15                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 16            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 17            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 18            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 19            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 20            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 21            writing to the application or use of an 22            alternative method of apportionment under Section 23            304(f); 24                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 25            Director from making any other adjustment 26            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act   HB3310- 10 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            for any tax year beginning after the effective 2            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 3            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 4            Department and such regulations provide methods 5            and standards by which the Department will utilize 6            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 7            (D-19) For taxable years ending on or after 8        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 9        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 10        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 11        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 12        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 13        business group but for the fact that the person is 14        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 15        included in the unitary business group because he or 16        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 17        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 18        addition modification required by this subparagraph 19        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 20        included in base income of the unitary group for the 21        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 22        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 23        (including amounts included in gross income under 24        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 26        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the   HB3310- 11 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 2        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 3        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 4        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 5        the addition modification required under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-17) or Section 203(a)(2)(D-18) of this 7        Act; 8            (D-20) For taxable years beginning on or after 9        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 10        2006, in the case of a distribution from a qualified 11        tuition program under Section 529 of the Internal 12        Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution from a 13        College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 of the 14        State Treasurer Act or (ii) a distribution from the 15        Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, an amount equal 16        to the amount excluded from gross income under Section 17        529(c)(3)(B). For taxable years beginning on or after 18        January 1, 2007, in the case of a distribution from a 19        qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code, other than (i) a distribution 21        from a College Savings Pool created under Section 16.5 22        of the State Treasurer Act, (ii) a distribution from 23        the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund, or (iii) a 24        distribution from a qualified tuition program under 25        Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code that (I) 26        adopts and determines that its offering materials   HB3310- 12 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        comply with the College Savings Plans Network's 2        disclosure principles and (II) has made reasonable 3        efforts to inform in-state residents of the existence 4        of in-state qualified tuition programs by informing 5        Illinois residents directly and, where applicable, to 6        inform financial intermediaries distributing the 7        program to inform in-state residents of the existence 8        of in-state qualified tuition programs at least 9        annually, an amount equal to the amount excluded from 10        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(B).11            For the purposes of this subparagraph (D-20), a 12        qualified tuition program has made reasonable efforts 13        if it makes disclosures (which may use the term 14        "in-state program" or "in-state plan" and need not 15        specifically refer to Illinois or its qualified 16        programs by name) (i) directly to prospective 17        participants in its offering materials or makes a 18        public disclosure, such as a website posting; and (ii) 19        where applicable, to intermediaries selling the 20        out-of-state program in the same manner that the 21        out-of-state program distributes its offering 22        materials;23            (D-20.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2018, in the case of a distribution from a 25        qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 26        Internal Revenue Code, other than a distribution from   HB3310- 13 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        a qualified ABLE program created under Section 16.6 of 2        the State Treasurer Act, an amount equal to the amount 3        excluded from gross income under Section 529A(c)(1)(B) 4        of the Internal Revenue Code; 5            (D-21) For taxable years beginning on or after 6        January 1, 2007, in the case of transfer of moneys from 7        a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by the 9        State to an out-of-state program, an amount equal to 10        the amount of moneys previously deducted from base 11        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section;12            (D-21.5) For taxable years beginning on or after 13        January 1, 2018, in the case of the transfer of moneys 14        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 or 15        a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of the 16        Internal Revenue Code that is administered by this 17        State to an ABLE account established under an 18        out-of-state ABLE account program, an amount equal to 19        the contribution component of the transferred amount 20        that was previously deducted from base income under 21        subsection (a)(2)(Y) or subsection (a)(2)(HH) of this 22        Section; 23            (D-22) For taxable years beginning on or after 24        January 1, 2009, and prior to January 1, 2018, in the 25        case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund of moneys 26        from a qualified tuition program under Section 529 of   HB3310- 14 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 2        that is not used for qualified expenses at an eligible 3        education institution, an amount equal to the 4        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 5        or refund that was previously deducted from base 6        income under subsection (a)(2)(y) of this Section, 7        provided that the withdrawal or refund did not result 8        from the beneficiary's death or disability. For 9        taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2018: 10        (1) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or 11        refund, as defined under Section 16.5 of the State 12        Treasurer Act, of moneys from a qualified tuition 13        program under Section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code 14        administered by the State, an amount equal to the 15        contribution component of the nonqualified withdrawal 16        or refund that was previously deducted from base 17        income under subsection (a)(2)(Y) of this Section, and 18        (2) in the case of a nonqualified withdrawal or refund 19        from a qualified ABLE program under Section 529A of 20        the Internal Revenue Code administered by the State 21        that is not used for qualified disability expenses, an 22        amount equal to the contribution component of the 23        nonqualified withdrawal or refund that was previously 24        deducted from base income under subsection (a)(2)(HH) 25        of this Section;26            (D-23) An amount equal to the credit allowable to   HB3310- 15 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 2        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 3        Act;4            (D-24) For taxable years ending on or after 5        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 6        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 7        for the taxable year; 8            (D-25) In the case of a resident, an amount equal 9        to the amount of tax for which a credit is allowed 10        pursuant to Section 201(p)(7) of this Act; 11    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 12    following amounts:13            (E) For taxable years ending before December 31, 14        2001, any amount included in such total in respect of 15        any compensation (including but not limited to any 16        compensation paid or accrued to a serviceman while a 17        prisoner of war or missing in action) paid to a 18        resident by reason of being on active duty in the Armed 19        Forces of the United States and in respect of any 20        compensation paid or accrued to a resident who as a 21        governmental employee was a prisoner of war or missing 22        in action, and in respect of any compensation paid to a 23        resident in 1971 or thereafter for annual training 24        performed pursuant to Sections 502 and 503, Title 32, 25        United States Code as a member of the Illinois 26        National Guard or, beginning with taxable years ending   HB3310- 16 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        on or after December 31, 2007, the National Guard of 2        any other state. For taxable years ending on or after 3        December 31, 2001, any amount included in such total 4        in respect of any compensation (including but not 5        limited to any compensation paid or accrued to a 6        serviceman while a prisoner of war or missing in 7        action) paid to a resident by reason of being a member 8        of any component of the Armed Forces of the United 9        States and in respect of any compensation paid or 10        accrued to a resident who as a governmental employee 11        was a prisoner of war or missing in action, and in 12        respect of any compensation paid to a resident in 2001 13        or thereafter by reason of being a member of the 14        Illinois National Guard or, beginning with taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2007, the 16        National Guard of any other state. The provisions of 17        this subparagraph (E) are exempt from the provisions 18        of Section 250;19            (F) An amount equal to all amounts included in 20        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections 21        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a), and 22        408 of the Internal Revenue Code, or included in such 23        total as distributions under the provisions of any 24        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 25        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 26        retired partners, which payments are excluded in   HB3310- 17 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 2        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 3        adopted pursuant thereto;4            (G) The valuation limitation amount;5            (H) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 6        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 7        and included in such total for the taxable year;8            (I) An amount equal to all amounts included in 9        such total pursuant to the provisions of Section 111 10        of the Internal Revenue Code as a recovery of items 11        previously deducted from adjusted gross income in the 12        computation of taxable income;13            (J) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act, and conducts 18        substantially all of its operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones. This subparagraph (J) is 20        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;21            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   HB3310- 18 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (K);4            (L) For taxable years ending after December 31, 5        1983, an amount equal to all social security benefits 6        and railroad retirement benefits included in such 7        total pursuant to Sections 72(r) and 86 of the 8        Internal Revenue Code;9            (M) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 10        under subparagraph (N), an amount equal to the sum of 11        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 12        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 13        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 14        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 16        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 17        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 18        Internal Revenue Code, plus, for taxable years ending 19        on or after December 31, 2011, Section 45G(e)(3) of 20        the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 21        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 22        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 23        Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 24        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 25        250;26            (N) An amount equal to all amounts included in   HB3310- 19 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 2        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 3        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 4        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 5        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 6        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 7        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 8        net of bond premium amortization;9            (O) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 10        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 11        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;12            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 13        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 14        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 15        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code or of any itemized deduction 17        taken from adjusted gross income in the computation of 18        taxable income for restoration of substantial amounts 19        held under claim of right for the taxable year;20            (Q) An amount equal to any amounts included in 21        such total, received by the taxpayer as an 22        acceleration in the payment of life, endowment or 23        annuity benefits in advance of the time they would 24        otherwise be payable as an indemnity for a terminal 25        illness;26            (R) An amount equal to the amount of any federal or   HB3310- 20 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        State bonus paid to veterans of the Persian Gulf War;2            (S) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 3        gross income, equal to the amount of a contribution 4        made in the taxable year on behalf of the taxpayer to a 5        medical care savings account established under the 6        Medical Care Savings Account Act or the Medical Care 7        Savings Account Act of 2000 to the extent the 8        contribution is accepted by the account administrator 9        as provided in that Act;10            (T) An amount, to the extent included in adjusted 11        gross income, equal to the amount of interest earned 12        in the taxable year on a medical care savings account 13        established under the Medical Care Savings Account Act 14        or the Medical Care Savings Account Act of 2000 on 15        behalf of the taxpayer, other than interest added 16        pursuant to item (D-5) of this paragraph (2);17            (U) For one taxable year beginning on or after 18        January 1, 1994, an amount equal to the total amount of 19        tax imposed and paid under subsections (a) and (b) of 20        Section 201 of this Act on grant amounts received by 21        the taxpayer under the Nursing Home Grant Assistance 22        Act during the taxpayer's taxable years 1992 and 1993;23            (V) Beginning with tax years ending on or after 24        December 31, 1995 and ending with tax years ending on 25        or before December 31, 2004, an amount equal to the 26        amount paid by a taxpayer who is a self-employed   HB3310- 21 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        taxpayer, a partner of a partnership, or a shareholder 2        in a Subchapter S corporation for health insurance or 3        long-term care insurance for that taxpayer or that 4        taxpayer's spouse or dependents, to the extent that 5        the amount paid for that health insurance or long-term 6        care insurance may be deducted under Section 213 of 7        the Internal Revenue Code, has not been deducted on 8        the federal income tax return of the taxpayer, and 9        does not exceed the taxable income attributable to 10        that taxpayer's income, self-employment income, or 11        Subchapter S corporation income; except that no 12        deduction shall be allowed under this item (V) if the 13        taxpayer is eligible to participate in any health 14        insurance or long-term care insurance plan of an 15        employer of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse. The 16        amount of the health insurance and long-term care 17        insurance subtracted under this item (V) shall be 18        determined by multiplying total health insurance and 19        long-term care insurance premiums paid by the taxpayer 20        times a number that represents the fractional 21        percentage of eligible medical expenses under Section 22        213 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 not actually 23        deducted on the taxpayer's federal income tax return;24            (W) For taxable years beginning on or after 25        January 1, 1998, all amounts included in the 26        taxpayer's federal gross income in the taxable year   HB3310- 22 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        from amounts converted from a regular IRA to a Roth 2        IRA. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 3        Section 250;4            (X) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 5        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 6        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 7        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 8        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 9        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 10        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 11        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 12        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 13        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 14        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 15        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi 16        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 17        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 18        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 19        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 20        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 21        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 22        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 23        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 24        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 25        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 26        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this   HB3310- 23 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 2        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 3        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 4        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 5        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 6        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 7        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 8        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 9        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 10        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;11            (Y) For taxable years beginning on or after 12        January 1, 2002 and ending on or before December 31, 13        2004, moneys contributed in the taxable year to a 14        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 15        State Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from 16        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 17        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 18        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For taxable 19        years beginning on or after January 1, 2005, a maximum 20        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to (i) a 21        College Savings Pool account under Section 16.5 of the 22        State Treasurer Act or (ii) the Illinois Prepaid 23        Tuition Trust Fund, except that amounts excluded from 24        gross income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) of the 25        Internal Revenue Code shall not be considered moneys 26        contributed under this subparagraph (Y). For purposes   HB3310- 24 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        of this subparagraph, contributions made by an 2        employer on behalf of an employee, or matching 3        contributions made by an employee, shall be treated as 4        made by the employee. This subparagraph (Y) is exempt 5        from the provisions of Section 250;6            (Z) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 7        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 8        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 9        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 10        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 11        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:12                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 13            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 14            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 15            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 16            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 17            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 18            including the bonus depreciation deduction;19                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 20            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 21            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 22            0.429); and23                (3) for taxable years ending after December 24            31, 2005:25                    (i) for property on which a bonus 26                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted   HB3310- 25 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 2                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 3                by 0.429);4                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 5                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 6                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 7                1.0;8                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 9                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 10                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 11                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 12                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 13                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 14                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 15                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 16                depreciation on that property; and17                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 18                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 19                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 20                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 21                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 22                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 23                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 24                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 25                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 26                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)).   HB3310- 26 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            The aggregate amount deducted under this 2        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 3        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 4        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 5        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 6        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 7        subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the provisions of 8        Section 250;9            (AA) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 10        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 11        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 12        addition modification under subparagraph (D-15), then 13        an amount equal to that addition modification. 14            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 15        the last day of the last tax year for which a 16        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 17        under subparagraph (Z) and for which the taxpayer was 18        required in any taxable year to make an addition 19        modification under subparagraph (D-15), then an amount 20        equal to that addition modification. 21            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 22        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 23        one piece of property.24            This subparagraph (AA) is exempt from the 25        provisions of Section 250;26            (BB) Any amount included in adjusted gross income,   HB3310- 27 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        other than salary, received by a driver in a 2        ridesharing arrangement using a motor vehicle;3            (CC) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 4        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 5        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 6        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 7        modification with respect to such transaction under 8        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 9        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 10        the amount of that addition modification, and (ii) any 11        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 12        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 13        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 14        that is required to make an addition modification with 15        respect to such transaction under Section 16        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 17        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of that 18        addition modification. This subparagraph (CC) is 19        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;20            (DD) An amount equal to the interest income taken 21        into account for the taxable year (net of the 22        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 23        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 24        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 25        for the fact that the foreign person's business 26        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of   HB3310- 28 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 2        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 3        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 4        business group but for the fact that the person is 5        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 6        included in the unitary business group because he or 7        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 8        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 9        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 10        made for the same taxable year under Section 11        203(a)(2)(D-17) for interest paid, accrued, or 12        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 13        This subparagraph (DD) is exempt from the provisions 14        of Section 250; 15            (EE) An amount equal to the income from intangible 16        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 17        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 18        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 19        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 20        for the fact that the foreign person's business 21        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 22        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 23        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB3310- 29 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 4        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 5        made for the same taxable year under Section 6        203(a)(2)(D-18) for intangible expenses and costs 7        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 8        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (EE) is 9        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;10            (FF) An amount equal to any amount awarded to the 11        taxpayer during the taxable year by the Court of 12        Claims under subsection (c) of Section 8 of the Court 13        of Claims Act for time unjustly served in a State 14        prison. This subparagraph (FF) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250; 16            (GG) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(a)(2)(D-19), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   HB3310- 30 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        (GG), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (GG). This 4        subparagraph (GG) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (HH) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2018 and prior to January 1, 2028, a maximum 8        of $10,000 contributed in the taxable year to a 9        qualified ABLE account under Section 16.6 of the State 10        Treasurer Act, except that amounts excluded from gross 11        income under Section 529(c)(3)(C)(i) or Section 12        529A(c)(1)(C) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not 13        be considered moneys contributed under this 14        subparagraph (HH). For purposes of this subparagraph 15        (HH), contributions made by an employer on behalf of 16        an employee, or matching contributions made by an 17        employee, shall be treated as made by the employee; 18            (II) For taxable years that begin on or after 19        January 1, 2021 and begin before January 1, 2026, the 20        amount that is included in the taxpayer's federal 21        adjusted gross income pursuant to Section 61 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code as discharge of indebtedness 23        attributable to student loan forgiveness and that is 24        not excluded from the taxpayer's federal adjusted 25        gross income pursuant to paragraph (5) of subsection 26        (f) of Section 108 of the Internal Revenue Code;   HB3310- 31 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (JJ) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 3        operating in this State and licensed under the 4        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 5        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 6        organization operating in this State and licensed 7        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 8        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 9        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 10        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 11        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 12        this subparagraph (JJ) are exempt from the provisions 13        of Section 250; and 14            (KK) To the extent includible in gross income for 15        federal income tax purposes, any amount awarded or 16        paid to the taxpayer as a result of a judgment or 17        settlement for fertility fraud as provided in Section 18        15 of the Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, donor 19        fertility fraud as provided in Section 20 of the 20        Illinois Fertility Fraud Act, or similar action in 21        another state; and 22            (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 23        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a qualified 24        worker, as defined in the Workforce Development 25        through Charitable Loan Repayment Act, an amount equal 26        to the amount included in the taxpayer's federal   HB3310- 32 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        adjusted gross income that is attributable to student 2        loan repayment assistance received by the taxpayer 3        during the taxable year from a qualified community 4        foundation under the provisions of the Workforce 5        Development through Through Charitable Loan Repayment 6        Act. 7            This subparagraph (LL) is exempt from the 8        provisions of Section 250; . 9            (MM) (LL) For taxable years beginning on or after 10        January 1, 2025, if the taxpayer is an eligible 11        resident as defined in the Medical Debt Relief Act, an 12        amount equal to the amount included in the taxpayer's 13        federal adjusted gross income that is attributable to 14        medical debt relief received by the taxpayer during 15        the taxable year from a nonprofit medical debt relief 16        coordinator under the provisions of the Medical Debt 17        Relief Act. This subparagraph (MM) (LL) is exempt from 18        the provisions of Section 250; and . 19            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a privately owned 21        childcare center, 100% of the property taxes paid by 22        the taxpayer during the taxable year on childcare 23        center property.  24    (b) Corporations.25        (1) In general. In the case of a corporation, base   HB3310- 33 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 2    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).3        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 4    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 5    of the following amounts:6            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 7        to the taxpayer as interest and all distributions 8        received from regulated investment companies during 9        the taxable year to the extent excluded from gross 10        income in the computation of taxable income;11            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 12        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 13        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 14        year;15            (C) In the case of a regulated investment company, 16        an amount equal to the excess of (i) the net long-term 17        capital gain for the taxable year, over (ii) the 18        amount of the capital gain dividends designated as 19        such in accordance with Section 852(b)(3)(C) of the 20        Internal Revenue Code and any amount designated under 21        Section 852(b)(3)(D) of the Internal Revenue Code, 22        attributable to the taxable year (this amendatory Act 23        of 1995 (Public Act 89-89) is declarative of existing 24        law and is not a new enactment);25            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 26        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net   HB3310- 34 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 2        ending prior to December 31, 1986;3            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 4        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 5        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 6        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 7        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 8        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 9        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 10        subtraction modifications in such earlier taxable 11        year, with the following limitations applied in the 12        order that they are listed:13                (i) the addition modification relating to the 14            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 15            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 16            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 17            of addition modification under this subparagraph 18            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 19            which was taken into account in calculating the 20            base income of an earlier taxable year, and21                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 22            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 23            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 24            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 25            such carryback or carryforward;26            For taxable years in which there is a net   HB3310- 35 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 2        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 3        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 4        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 5        computed independently under the preceding provisions 6        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;7            (E-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 8        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 9        costs that the corporation deducted in computing 10        adjusted gross income and for which the corporation 11        claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 201;12            (E-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 13        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 14        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 15        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 16        the Internal Revenue Code;17            (E-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 18        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 19        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 20        addition modification under subparagraph (E-10), then 21        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 22        deductions taken in all taxable years under 23        subparagraph (T) with respect to that property.24            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 25        the last day of the last tax year for which a 26        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property   HB3310- 36 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 2        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 3        modification under subparagraph (T), then an amount 4        equal to that subtraction modification. 5            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 6        modification under this subparagraph only once with 7        respect to any one piece of property;8            (E-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 9        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 10        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 11        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 12        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 13        member of the same unitary business group but for the 14        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 15        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 16        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 17        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 18        who would be a member of the same unitary business 19        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 20        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 21        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 22        required to apportion business income under different 23        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 24        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 25        extent that dividends were included in base income of 26        the unitary group for the same taxable year and   HB3310- 37 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 2        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 3        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 4        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 5        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 6        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 7        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 8        accrued, or incurred. 9            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 10                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 11            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 12            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 13            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 14            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 15            with respect to such interest; or16                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 17            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 18            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 19            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 20            following:21                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 22                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 23                to a person that is not a related member, and24                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 25                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 26                person did not have as a principal purpose the   HB3310- 38 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 2                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 3                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 4                terms; or 5                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 6            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 7            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 8            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 9            and terms and the principal purpose for the 10            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 11            or 12                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 13            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 14            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 15            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 16            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 17            to the application or use of an alternative method 18            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 19                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 20            Director from making any other adjustment 21            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 22            for any tax year beginning after the effective 23            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 24            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 25            Department and such regulations provide methods 26            and standards by which the Department will utilize   HB3310- 39 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 2            (E-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 3        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 4        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 5        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 6        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 7        foreign person who would be a member of the same 8        unitary business group but for the fact that the 9        foreign person's business activity outside the United 10        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 11        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 12        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 13        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 14        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 15        from being included in the unitary business group 16        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 17        business income under different subsections of Section 18        304. The addition modification required by this 19        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 20        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 21        group for the same taxable year and received by the 22        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 23        business group (including amounts included in gross 24        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 25        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 26        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code)   HB3310- 40 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 2        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 3        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding 4        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 5        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 6        modification required under Section 203(b)(2)(E-12) of 7        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 8        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 9        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 10        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 11        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 12        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 13        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 14        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 15        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 16        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 17        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 18        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service 19        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 20        similar types of intangible assets.21            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:22                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 23            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 24            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 25            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 26            than a state which requires mandatory unitary   HB3310- 41 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 2            with respect to such item; or3                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 4            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 5            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 6            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 7            following:8                    (a) the person during the same taxable 9                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 10                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 11                not a related member, and12                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 13                intangible expense or cost between the 14                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 15                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 16                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 17                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 18                or19                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 20            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 21            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 22            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 23            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 24            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 25            writing to the application or use of an 26            alternative method of apportionment under Section   HB3310- 42 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            304(f); 2                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 3            Director from making any other adjustment 4            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 5            for any tax year beginning after the effective 6            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 7            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 8            Department and such regulations provide methods 9            and standards by which the Department will utilize 10            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 11            (E-14) For taxable years ending on or after 12        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 13        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 14        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 15        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 16        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 17        business group but for the fact that the person is 18        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 19        included in the unitary business group because he or 20        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 21        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 22        addition modification required by this subparagraph 23        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 24        included in base income of the unitary group for the 25        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 26        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group   HB3310- 43 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        (including amounts included in gross income under 2        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 3        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 4        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 5        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 6        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 7        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 8        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 9        the addition modification required under Section 10        203(b)(2)(E-12) or Section 203(b)(2)(E-13) of this 11        Act; 12            (E-15) For taxable years beginning after December 13        31, 2008, any deduction for dividends paid by a 14        captive real estate investment trust that is allowed 15        to a real estate investment trust under Section 16        857(b)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code for 17        dividends paid;18            (E-16) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 19        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 20        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 21        Act;22            (E-17) For taxable years ending on or after 23        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 24        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        for the taxable year; 26            (E-18) for taxable years beginning after December   HB3310- 44 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        31, 2018, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 2        under Section 250(a)(1)(A) of the Internal Revenue 3        Code for the taxable year; 4            (E-19) for taxable years ending on or after June 5        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 6        under Section 250(a)(1)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue 7        Code for the taxable year; 8            (E-20) for taxable years ending on or after June 9        30, 2021, an amount equal to the deduction allowed 10        under Sections 243(e) and 245A(a) of the Internal 11        Revenue Code for the taxable year; 12            (E-21) the amount that is claimed as a federal 13        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 14        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 15        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 16        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 17        Tax Credit Act; 18    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 19    following amounts:20            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 21        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 22        and included in such total for the taxable year;23            (G) An amount equal to any amount included in such 24        total under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code;25            (H) In the case of a regulated investment company, 26        an amount equal to the amount of exempt interest   HB3310- 45 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        dividends as defined in subsection (b)(5) of Section 2        852 of the Internal Revenue Code, paid to shareholders 3        for the taxable year;4            (I) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 5        under subparagraph (J), an amount equal to the sum of 6        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 7        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) and amounts disallowed as 8        interest expense by Section 291(a)(3) of the Internal 9        Revenue Code, and all amounts of expenses allocable to 10        interest and disallowed as deductions by Section 11        265(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for 12        taxable years ending on or after August 13, 1999, 13        Sections 171(a)(2), 265, 280C, 291(a)(3), and 14        832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the Internal Revenue Code, plus, 15        for tax years ending on or after December 31, 2011, 16        amounts disallowed as deductions by Section 45G(e)(3) 17        of the Internal Revenue Code and, for taxable years 18        ending on or after December 31, 2008, any amount 19        included in gross income under Section 87 of the 20        Internal Revenue Code and the policyholders' share of 21        tax-exempt interest of a life insurance company under 22        Section 807(a)(2)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 23        the case of a life insurance company with gross income 24        from a decrease in reserves for the tax year) or 25        Section 807(b)(1)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code (in 26        the case of a life insurance company allowed a   HB3310- 46 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        deduction for an increase in reserves for the tax 2        year); the provisions of this subparagraph are exempt 3        from the provisions of Section 250;4            (J) An amount equal to all amounts included in 5        such total which are exempt from taxation by this 6        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 7        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 8        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 9        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 10        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 11        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 12        net of bond premium amortization;13            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 14        such total which were paid by a corporation which 15        conducts business operations in a River Edge 16        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 17        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 18        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 19        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 20        the provisions of Section 250;21            (L) An amount equal to those dividends included in 22        such total that were paid by a corporation that 23        conducts business operations in a federally designated 24        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 25        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 26        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in   HB3310- 47 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        subparagraph (K) of paragraph 2 of this subsection 2        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 3        this subparagraph (L);4            (M) For any taxpayer that is a financial 5        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 6        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 7        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 8        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 9        property which is eligible for the River Edge 10        Redevelopment Zone Investment Credit. To determine the 11        portion of a loan or loans that is secured by property 12        eligible for a Section 201(f) investment credit to the 13        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 14        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 15        divided into the basis of the Section 201(f) 16        investment credit property which secures the loan or 17        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 18        such property on the date that it was placed in service 19        in the River Edge Redevelopment Zone. The subtraction 20        modification available to the taxpayer in any year 21        under this subsection shall be that portion of the 22        total interest paid by the borrower with respect to 23        such loan attributable to the eligible property as 24        calculated under the previous sentence. This 25        subparagraph (M) is exempt from the provisions of 26        Section 250;  HB3310- 48 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (M-1) For any taxpayer that is a financial 2        organization within the meaning of Section 304(c) of 3        this Act, an amount included in such total as interest 4        income from a loan or loans made by such taxpayer to a 5        borrower, to the extent that such a loan is secured by 6        property which is eligible for the High Impact 7        Business Investment Credit. To determine the portion 8        of a loan or loans that is secured by property eligible 9        for a Section 201(h) investment credit to the 10        borrower, the entire principal amount of the loan or 11        loans between the taxpayer and the borrower should be 12        divided into the basis of the Section 201(h) 13        investment credit property which secures the loan or 14        loans, using for this purpose the original basis of 15        such property on the date that it was placed in service 16        in a federally designated Foreign Trade Zone or 17        Sub-Zone located in Illinois. No taxpayer that is 18        eligible for the deduction provided in subparagraph 19        (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall be 20        eligible for the deduction provided under this 21        subparagraph (M-1). The subtraction modification 22        available to taxpayers in any year under this 23        subsection shall be that portion of the total interest 24        paid by the borrower with respect to such loan 25        attributable to the eligible property as calculated 26        under the previous sentence;  HB3310- 49 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (N) Two times any contribution made during the 2        taxable year to a designated zone organization to the 3        extent that the contribution (i) qualifies as a 4        charitable contribution under subsection (c) of 5        Section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code and (ii) 6        must, by its terms, be used for a project approved by 7        the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 8        under Section 11 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act 9        or under Section 10-10 of the River Edge Redevelopment 10        Zone Act. This subparagraph (N) is exempt from the 11        provisions of Section 250;12            (O) An amount equal to: (i) 85% for taxable years 13        ending on or before December 31, 1992, or, a 14        percentage equal to the percentage allowable under 15        Section 243(a)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 16        for taxable years ending after December 31, 1992, of 17        the amount by which dividends included in taxable 18        income and received from a corporation that is not 19        created or organized under the laws of the United 20        States or any state or political subdivision thereof, 21        including, for taxable years ending on or after 22        December 31, 1988, dividends received or deemed 23        received or paid or deemed paid under Sections 951 24        through 965 of the Internal Revenue Code, exceed the 25        amount of the modification provided under subparagraph 26        (G) of paragraph (2) of this subsection (b) which is   HB3310- 50 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        related to such dividends, and including, for taxable 2        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 3        received from a captive real estate investment trust; 4        plus (ii) 100% of the amount by which dividends, 5        included in taxable income and received, including, 6        for taxable years ending on or after December 31, 7        1988, dividends received or deemed received or paid or 8        deemed paid under Sections 951 through 964 of the 9        Internal Revenue Code and including, for taxable years 10        ending on or after December 31, 2008, dividends 11        received from a captive real estate investment trust, 12        from any such corporation specified in clause (i) that 13        would but for the provisions of Section 1504(b)(3) of 14        the Internal Revenue Code be treated as a member of the 15        affiliated group which includes the dividend 16        recipient, exceed the amount of the modification 17        provided under subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of 18        this subsection (b) which is related to such 19        dividends. For taxable years ending on or after June 20        30, 2021, (i) for purposes of this subparagraph, the 21        term "dividend" does not include any amount treated as 22        a dividend under Section 1248 of the Internal Revenue 23        Code, and (ii) this subparagraph shall not apply to 24        dividends for which a deduction is allowed under 25        Section 245(a) of the Internal Revenue Code. This 26        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of   HB3310- 51 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        Section 250 of this Act;2            (P) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 3        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 4        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;5            (Q) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 6        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 7        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 8        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 9        the Internal Revenue Code;10            (R) On and after July 20, 1999, in the case of an 11        attorney-in-fact with respect to whom an interinsurer 12        or a reciprocal insurer has made the election under 13        Section 835 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 14        835, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of the 15        amounts paid or incurred by that interinsurer or 16        reciprocal insurer in the taxable year to the 17        attorney-in-fact over the deduction allowed to that 18        interinsurer or reciprocal insurer with respect to the 19        attorney-in-fact under Section 835(b) of the Internal 20        Revenue Code for the taxable year; the provisions of 21        this subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of 22        Section 250;23            (S) For taxable years ending on or after December 24        31, 1997, in the case of a Subchapter S corporation, an 25        amount equal to all amounts of income allocable to a 26        shareholder subject to the Personal Property Tax   HB3310- 52 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        Replacement Income Tax imposed by subsections (c) and 2        (d) of Section 201 of this Act, including amounts 3        allocable to organizations exempt from federal income 4        tax by reason of Section 501(a) of the Internal 5        Revenue Code. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 6        provisions of Section 250;7            (T) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 8        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 9        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 10        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 11        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 12        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:13                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 14            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 15            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 16            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 17            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 18            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 19            including the bonus depreciation deduction;20                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 21            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 22            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 23            0.429); and24                (3) for taxable years ending after December 25            31, 2005:26                    (i) for property on which a bonus   HB3310- 53 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 2                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 3                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 4                by 0.429);5                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 7                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 8                1.0;9                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 10                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 11                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 12                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 13                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 14                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 15                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 16                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 17                depreciation on that property; and18                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 19                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 20                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 21                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 22                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 23                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 24                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 25                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 26                percentage bonus depreciation on the property   HB3310- 54 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 2            The aggregate amount deducted under this 3        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 4        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 5        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 6        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 7        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 8        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 9        Section 250;10            (U) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 11        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 12        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 13        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 14        equal to that addition modification.15            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 16        the last day of the last tax year for which a 17        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 18        under subparagraph (T) and for which the taxpayer was 19        required in any taxable year to make an addition 20        modification under subparagraph (E-10), then an amount 21        equal to that addition modification. 22            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 23        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 24        one piece of property.25            This subparagraph (U) is exempt from the 26        provisions of Section 250;  HB3310- 55 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (V) The amount of: (i) any interest income (net of 2        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 3        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 4        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 5        modification with respect to such transaction under 6        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 7        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 8        the amount of such addition modification, (ii) any 9        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 10        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 11        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 12        that is required to make an addition modification with 13        respect to such transaction under Section 14        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 15        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 16        addition modification, and (iii) any insurance premium 17        income (net of deductions allocable thereto) taken 18        into account for the taxable year with respect to a 19        transaction with a taxpayer that is required to make 20        an addition modification with respect to such 21        transaction under Section 203(a)(2)(D-19), Section 22        203(b)(2)(E-14), Section 203(c)(2)(G-14), or Section 23        203(d)(2)(D-9), but not to exceed the amount of that 24        addition modification. This subparagraph (V) is exempt 25        from the provisions of Section 250; 26            (W) An amount equal to the interest income taken   HB3310- 56 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        into account for the taxable year (net of the 2        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 3        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 4        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 5        for the fact that the foreign person's business 6        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 7        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 8        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 9        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 10        business group but for the fact that the person is 11        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 12        included in the unitary business group because he or 13        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 14        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 15        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 16        made for the same taxable year under Section 17        203(b)(2)(E-12) for interest paid, accrued, or 18        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 19        This subparagraph (W) is exempt from the provisions of 20        Section 250; 21            (X) An amount equal to the income from intangible 22        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 23        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 24        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 25        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 26        for the fact that the foreign person's business   HB3310- 57 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 2        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 3        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 4        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 5        business group but for the fact that the person is 6        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 7        included in the unitary business group because he or 8        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 9        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 10        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 11        made for the same taxable year under Section 12        203(b)(2)(E-13) for intangible expenses and costs 13        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 14        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (X) is 15        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 16            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 17        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 18        add back any insurance premiums under Section 19        203(b)(2)(E-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 20        that part of a reimbursement received from the 21        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 22        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 23        company) that would have been taken into account as a 24        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 25        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 26        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph   HB3310- 58 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 2        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 3        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 4        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250; 6            (Z) The difference between the nondeductible 7        controlled foreign corporation dividends under Section 8        965(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code over the 9        taxable income of the taxpayer, computed without 10        regard to Section 965(e)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue 11        Code, and without regard to any net operating loss 12        deduction. This subparagraph (Z) is exempt from the 13        provisions of Section 250; and 14            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 15        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 16        operating in this State and licensed under the 17        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 18        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 19        organization operating in this State and licensed 20        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 21        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 22        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 23        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 24        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 25        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 26        of Section 250; and .   HB3310- 59 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (BB) For taxable years beginning on or after 2        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a privately owned 3        childcare center, 100% of the property taxes paid by 4        the taxpayer during the taxable year on childcare 5        center property. 6        (3) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (2)(A), 7    "gross income" in the case of a life insurance company, 8    for tax years ending on and after December 31, 1994, and 9    prior to December 31, 2011, shall mean the gross 10    investment income for the taxable year and, for tax years 11    ending on or after December 31, 2011, shall mean all 12    amounts included in life insurance gross income under 13    Section 803(a)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. 14    (c) Trusts and estates.15        (1) In general. In the case of a trust or estate, base 16    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable 17    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).18        (2) Modifications. Subject to the provisions of 19    paragraph (3), the taxable income referred to in paragraph 20    (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum of the 21    following amounts:22            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 23        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 24        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 25        in the computation of taxable income;  HB3310- 60 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (B) In the case of (i) an estate, $600; (ii) a 2        trust which, under its governing instrument, is 3        required to distribute all of its income currently, 4        $300; and (iii) any other trust, $100, but in each such 5        case, only to the extent such amount was deducted in 6        the computation of taxable income;7            (C) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 8        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income in 9        the computation of taxable income for the taxable 10        year;11            (D) The amount of any net operating loss deduction 12        taken in arriving at taxable income, other than a net 13        operating loss carried forward from a taxable year 14        ending prior to December 31, 1986;15            (E) For taxable years in which a net operating 16        loss carryback or carryforward from a taxable year 17        ending prior to December 31, 1986 is an element of 18        taxable income under paragraph (1) of subsection (e) 19        or subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection 20        (e), the amount by which addition modifications other 21        than those provided by this subparagraph (E) exceeded 22        subtraction modifications in such taxable year, with 23        the following limitations applied in the order that 24        they are listed:25                (i) the addition modification relating to the 26            net operating loss carried back or forward to the   HB3310- 61 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 2            December 31, 1986 shall be reduced by the amount 3            of addition modification under this subparagraph 4            (E) which related to that net operating loss and 5            which was taken into account in calculating the 6            base income of an earlier taxable year, and7                (ii) the addition modification relating to the 8            net operating loss carried back or forward to the 9            taxable year from any taxable year ending prior to 10            December 31, 1986 shall not exceed the amount of 11            such carryback or carryforward;12            For taxable years in which there is a net 13        operating loss carryback or carryforward from more 14        than one other taxable year ending prior to December 15        31, 1986, the addition modification provided in this 16        subparagraph (E) shall be the sum of the amounts 17        computed independently under the preceding provisions 18        of this subparagraph (E) for each such taxable year;19            (F) For taxable years ending on or after January 20        1, 1989, an amount equal to the tax deducted pursuant 21        to Section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code if the 22        trust or estate is claiming the same tax for purposes 23        of the Illinois foreign tax credit under Section 601 24        of this Act;25            (G) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 26        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue   HB3310- 62 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 2        computation of taxable income;3            (G-5) For taxable years ending after December 31, 4        1997, an amount equal to any eligible remediation 5        costs that the trust or estate deducted in computing 6        adjusted gross income and for which the trust or 7        estate claims a credit under subsection (l) of Section 8        201;9            (G-10) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 10        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 11        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 12        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 13        the Internal Revenue Code; and14            (G-11) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 15        or otherwise disposes of property for which the 16        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 17        addition modification under subparagraph (G-10), then 18        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 19        deductions taken in all taxable years under 20        subparagraph (R) with respect to that property.21            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 22        the last day of the last tax year for which a 23        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 24        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 25        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 26        modification under subparagraph (R), then an amount   HB3310- 63 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        equal to that subtraction modification. 2            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 3        modification under this subparagraph only once with 4        respect to any one piece of property;5            (G-12) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 6        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 7        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 8        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 9        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 10        member of the same unitary business group but for the 11        fact that the foreign person's business activity 12        outside the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 13        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 14        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 15        who would be a member of the same unitary business 16        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 17        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 18        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 19        required to apportion business income under different 20        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 21        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 22        extent that dividends were included in base income of 23        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 24        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 25        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 26        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951   HB3310- 64 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 2        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 4        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 5        accrued, or incurred. 6            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 7                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 8            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 9            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 10            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 11            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 12            with respect to such interest; or13                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 14            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 15            the taxpayer can establish, based on a 16            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 17            following:18                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 19                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 20                to a person that is not a related member, and21                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 22                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 23                person did not have as a principal purpose the 24                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 25                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 26                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and   HB3310- 65 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                terms; or 2                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 3            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 4            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 5            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 6            and terms and the principal purpose for the 7            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 8            or 9                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 10            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 11            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 12            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 13            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 14            to the application or use of an alternative method 15            of apportionment under Section 304(f). 16                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 17            Director from making any other adjustment 18            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 19            for any tax year beginning after the effective 20            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 21            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 22            Department and such regulations provide methods 23            and standards by which the Department will utilize 24            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 25            (G-13) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 26        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in   HB3310- 66 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 2        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 3        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 4        foreign person who would be a member of the same 5        unitary business group but for the fact that the 6        foreign person's business activity outside the United 7        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 8        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 9        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 10        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 11        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 12        from being included in the unitary business group 13        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 14        business income under different subsections of Section 15        304. The addition modification required by this 16        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 17        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 18        group for the same taxable year and received by the 19        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 20        business group (including amounts included in gross 21        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 22        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 23        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 24        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 25        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 26        indirectly paid, incurred, or accrued. The preceding   HB3310- 67 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 2        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 3        modification required under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) of 4        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 5        "intangible expenses and costs" includes: (1) 6        expenses, losses, and costs for or related to the 7        direct or indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or 8        management, ownership, sale, exchange, or any other 9        disposition of intangible property; (2) losses 10        incurred, directly or indirectly, from factoring 11        transactions or discounting transactions; (3) royalty, 12        patent, technical, and copyright fees; (4) licensing 13        fees; and (5) other similar expenses and costs. For 14        purposes of this subparagraph, "intangible property" 15        includes patents, patent applications, trade names, 16        trademarks, service marks, copyrights, mask works, 17        trade secrets, and similar types of intangible assets.18            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:19                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 20            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 21            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 22            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 23            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 24            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 25            with respect to such item; or26                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost   HB3310- 68 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 2            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 3            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 4            following:5                    (a) the person during the same taxable 6                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 7                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 8                not a related member, and9                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 10                intangible expense or cost between the 11                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 12                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 13                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 14                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 15                or16                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 17            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 18            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 19            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 20            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 21            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 22            writing to the application or use of an 23            alternative method of apportionment under Section 24            304(f); 25                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 26            Director from making any other adjustment   HB3310- 69 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 2            for any tax year beginning after the effective 3            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 4            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 5            Department and such regulations provide methods 6            and standards by which the Department will utilize 7            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 8            (G-14) For taxable years ending on or after 9        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 10        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 11        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 12        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 13        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 14        business group but for the fact that the person is 15        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 16        included in the unitary business group because he or 17        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 18        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 19        addition modification required by this subparagraph 20        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 21        included in base income of the unitary group for the 22        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 23        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 24        (including amounts included in gross income under 25        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 26        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78   HB3310- 70 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 2        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 3        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 4        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 5        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 6        the addition modification required under Section 7        203(c)(2)(G-12) or Section 203(c)(2)(G-13) of this 8        Act;9            (G-15) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 10        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 11        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 12        Act;13            (G-16) For taxable years ending on or after 14        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 15        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 16        for the taxable year; 17            (G-17) the amount that is claimed as a federal 18        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 19        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 20        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 21        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 22        Tax Credit Act; 23    and by deducting from the total so obtained the sum of the 24    following amounts:25            (H) An amount equal to all amounts included in 26        such total pursuant to the provisions of Sections   HB3310- 71 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        402(a), 402(c), 403(a), 403(b), 406(a), 407(a) and 408 2        of the Internal Revenue Code or included in such total 3        as distributions under the provisions of any 4        retirement or disability plan for employees of any 5        governmental agency or unit, or retirement payments to 6        retired partners, which payments are excluded in 7        computing net earnings from self employment by Section 8        1402 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations 9        adopted pursuant thereto;10            (I) The valuation limitation amount;11            (J) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 12        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 13        and included in such total for the taxable year;14            (K) An amount equal to all amounts included in 15        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 16        (C), (D), (E), (F) and (G) which are exempt from 17        taxation by this State either by reason of its 18        statutes or Constitution or by reason of the 19        Constitution, treaties or statutes of the United 20        States; provided that, in the case of any statute of 21        this State that exempts income derived from bonds or 22        other obligations from the tax imposed under this Act, 23        the amount exempted shall be the interest net of bond 24        premium amortization;25            (L) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 26        under subparagraph (K), an amount equal to the sum of   HB3310- 72 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 2        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 3        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 4        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 5        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 6        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 7        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 8        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 9        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 10        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 11        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 12        any amount included in gross income under Section 87 13        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 14        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 15        250;16            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 17        such total which were paid by a corporation which 18        conducts business operations in a River Edge 19        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 20        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 21        all of its operations in a River Edge Redevelopment 22        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (M) is exempt from 23        the provisions of Section 250;24            (N) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 25        job training project established pursuant to the Tax 26        Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;  HB3310- 73 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (O) An amount equal to those dividends included in 2        such total that were paid by a corporation that 3        conducts business operations in a federally designated 4        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 5        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 6        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 7        subparagraph (M) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 8        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 9        this subparagraph (O);10            (P) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 11        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 12        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of 13        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 14        the Internal Revenue Code;15            (Q) For taxable year 1999 and thereafter, an 16        amount equal to the amount of any (i) distributions, 17        to the extent includible in gross income for federal 18        income tax purposes, made to the taxpayer because of 19        his or her status as a victim of persecution for racial 20        or religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 21        regime or as an heir of the victim and (ii) items of 22        income, to the extent includible in gross income for 23        federal income tax purposes, attributable to, derived 24        from or in any way related to assets stolen from, 25        hidden from, or otherwise lost to a victim of 26        persecution for racial or religious reasons by Nazi   HB3310- 74 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        Germany or any other Axis regime immediately prior to, 2        during, and immediately after World War II, including, 3        but not limited to, interest on the proceeds 4        receivable as insurance under policies issued to a 5        victim of persecution for racial or religious reasons 6        by Nazi Germany or any other Axis regime by European 7        insurance companies immediately prior to and during 8        World War II; provided, however, this subtraction from 9        federal adjusted gross income does not apply to assets 10        acquired with such assets or with the proceeds from 11        the sale of such assets; provided, further, this 12        paragraph shall only apply to a taxpayer who was the 13        first recipient of such assets after their recovery 14        and who is a victim of persecution for racial or 15        religious reasons by Nazi Germany or any other Axis 16        regime or as an heir of the victim. The amount of and 17        the eligibility for any public assistance, benefit, or 18        similar entitlement is not affected by the inclusion 19        of items (i) and (ii) of this paragraph in gross income 20        for federal income tax purposes. This paragraph is 21        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;22            (R) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 23        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 24        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 25        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 26        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year   HB3310- 75 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:2                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 3            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 4            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 5            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 6            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 7            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 8            including the bonus depreciation deduction;9                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 10            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 11            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 12            0.429); and13                (3) for taxable years ending after December 14            31, 2005:15                    (i) for property on which a bonus 16                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 17                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 18                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 19                by 0.429);20                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 21                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 22                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 23                1.0;24                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 25                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 26                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or   HB3310- 76 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 2                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 3                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 4                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 5                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 6                depreciation on that property; and7                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 8                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 9                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 10                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 11                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 12                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 13                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 14                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 15                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 16                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 17            The aggregate amount deducted under this 18        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 19        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus 20        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 21        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 22        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 23        subparagraph (R) is exempt from the provisions of 24        Section 250;25            (S) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 26        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer   HB3310- 77 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 2        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 3        equal to that addition modification.4            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 5        the last day of the last tax year for which a 6        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 7        under subparagraph (R) and for which the taxpayer was 8        required in any taxable year to make an addition 9        modification under subparagraph (G-10), then an amount 10        equal to that addition modification. 11            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 12        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 13        one piece of property.14            This subparagraph (S) is exempt from the 15        provisions of Section 250;16            (T) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 17        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 18        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 19        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition 20        modification with respect to such transaction under 21        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 22        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 23        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 24        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 25        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 26        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer   HB3310- 78 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        that is required to make an addition modification with 2        respect to such transaction under Section 3        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 4        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 5        addition modification. This subparagraph (T) is exempt 6        from the provisions of Section 250; 7            (U) An amount equal to the interest income taken 8        into account for the taxable year (net of the 9        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 10        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 11        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 12        for the fact the foreign person's business activity 13        outside the United States is 80% or more of that 14        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 15        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 16        who would be a member of the same unitary business 17        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 18        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 19        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 20        required to apportion business income under different 21        subsections of Section 304, but not to exceed the 22        addition modification required to be made for the same 23        taxable year under Section 203(c)(2)(G-12) for 24        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 25        indirectly, to the same person. This subparagraph (U) 26        is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;   HB3310- 79 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (V) An amount equal to the income from intangible 2        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 3        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 4        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 5        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 6        for the fact that the foreign person's business 7        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 8        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 9        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 10        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 11        business group but for the fact that the person is 12        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 13        included in the unitary business group because he or 14        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 15        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 16        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 17        made for the same taxable year under Section 18        203(c)(2)(G-13) for intangible expenses and costs 19        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 20        the same foreign person. This subparagraph (V) is 21        exempt from the provisions of Section 250; 22            (W) in the case of an estate, an amount equal to 23        all amounts included in such total pursuant to the 24        provisions of Section 111 of the Internal Revenue Code 25        as a recovery of items previously deducted by the 26        decedent from adjusted gross income in the computation   HB3310- 80 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        of taxable income. This subparagraph (W) is exempt 2        from Section 250; 3            (X) an amount equal to the refund included in such 4        total of any tax deducted for federal income tax 5        purposes, to the extent that deduction was added back 6        under subparagraph (F). This subparagraph (X) is 7        exempt from the provisions of Section 250;8            (Y) For taxable years ending on or after December 9        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 10        add back any insurance premiums under Section 11        203(c)(2)(G-14), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 12        that part of a reimbursement received from the 13        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 14        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 15        company) that would have been taken into account as a 16        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 17        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 18        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 19        (Y), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 20        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 21        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (Y). This 22        subparagraph (Y) is exempt from the provisions of 23        Section 250;24            (Z) For taxable years beginning after December 31, 25        2018 and before January 1, 2026, the amount of excess 26        business loss of the taxpayer disallowed as a   HB3310- 81 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        deduction by Section 461(l)(1)(B) of the Internal 2        Revenue Code; and 3            (AA) For taxable years beginning on or after 4        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 5        operating in this State and licensed under the 6        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 7        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 8        organization operating in this State and licensed 9        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 10        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that 11        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 12        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 13        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 14        this subparagraph (AA) are exempt from the provisions 15        of Section 250. 16        (3) Limitation. The amount of any modification 17    otherwise required under this subsection shall, under 18    regulations prescribed by the Department, be adjusted by 19    any amounts included therein which were properly paid, 20    credited, or required to be distributed, or permanently 21    set aside for charitable purposes pursuant to Internal 22    Revenue Code Section 642(c) during the taxable year. 23    (d) Partnerships.24        (1) In general. In the case of a partnership, base 25    income means an amount equal to the taxpayer's taxable   HB3310- 82 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1    income for the taxable year as modified by paragraph (2).2        (2) Modifications. The taxable income referred to in 3    paragraph (1) shall be modified by adding thereto the sum 4    of the following amounts:5            (A) An amount equal to all amounts paid or accrued 6        to the taxpayer as interest or dividends during the 7        taxable year to the extent excluded from gross income 8        in the computation of taxable income;9            (B) An amount equal to the amount of tax imposed by 10        this Act to the extent deducted from gross income for 11        the taxable year;12            (C) The amount of deductions allowed to the 13        partnership pursuant to Section 707 (c) of the 14        Internal Revenue Code in calculating its taxable 15        income;16            (D) An amount equal to the amount of the capital 17        gain deduction allowable under the Internal Revenue 18        Code, to the extent deducted from gross income in the 19        computation of taxable income;20            (D-5) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, an 21        amount equal to the bonus depreciation deduction taken 22        on the taxpayer's federal income tax return for the 23        taxable year under subsection (k) of Section 168 of 24        the Internal Revenue Code;25            (D-6) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, 26        or otherwise disposes of property for which the   HB3310- 83 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        taxpayer was required in any taxable year to make an 2        addition modification under subparagraph (D-5), then 3        an amount equal to the aggregate amount of the 4        deductions taken in all taxable years under 5        subparagraph (O) with respect to that property.6            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 7        the last day of the last tax year for which a 8        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 9        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 10        allowed in any taxable year to make a subtraction 11        modification under subparagraph (O), then an amount 12        equal to that subtraction modification. 13            The taxpayer is required to make the addition 14        modification under this subparagraph only once with 15        respect to any one piece of property;16            (D-7) An amount equal to the amount otherwise 17        allowed as a deduction in computing base income for 18        interest paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 19        indirectly, (i) for taxable years ending on or after 20        December 31, 2004, to a foreign person who would be a 21        member of the same unitary business group but for the 22        fact the foreign person's business activity outside 23        the United States is 80% or more of the foreign 24        person's total business activity and (ii) for taxable 25        years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to a person 26        who would be a member of the same unitary business   HB3310- 84 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        group but for the fact that the person is prohibited 2        under Section 1501(a)(27) from being included in the 3        unitary business group because he or she is ordinarily 4        required to apportion business income under different 5        subsections of Section 304. The addition modification 6        required by this subparagraph shall be reduced to the 7        extent that dividends were included in base income of 8        the unitary group for the same taxable year and 9        received by the taxpayer or by a member of the 10        taxpayer's unitary business group (including amounts 11        included in gross income pursuant to Sections 951 12        through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code and amounts 13        included in gross income under Section 78 of the 14        Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the stock of 15        the same person to whom the interest was paid, 16        accrued, or incurred. 17            This paragraph shall not apply to the following: 18                (i) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 19            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person who 20            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 21            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 22            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 23            with respect to such interest; or24                (ii) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 25            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 26            the taxpayer can establish, based on a   HB3310- 85 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            preponderance of the evidence, both of the 2            following:3                    (a) the person, during the same taxable 4                year, paid, accrued, or incurred, the interest 5                to a person that is not a related member, and6                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 7                interest expense between the taxpayer and the 8                person did not have as a principal purpose the 9                avoidance of Illinois income tax, and is paid 10                pursuant to a contract or agreement that 11                reflects an arm's-length interest rate and 12                terms; or 13                (iii) the taxpayer can establish, based on 14            clear and convincing evidence, that the interest 15            paid, accrued, or incurred relates to a contract 16            or agreement entered into at arm's-length rates 17            and terms and the principal purpose for the 18            payment is not federal or Illinois tax avoidance; 19            or 20                (iv) an item of interest paid, accrued, or 21            incurred, directly or indirectly, to a person if 22            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 23            evidence that the adjustments are unreasonable; or 24            if the taxpayer and the Director agree in writing 25            to the application or use of an alternative method 26            of apportionment under Section 304(f).   HB3310- 86 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 2            Director from making any other adjustment 3            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 4            for any tax year beginning after the effective 5            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 6            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 7            Department and such regulations provide methods 8            and standards by which the Department will utilize 9            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; and 10            (D-8) An amount equal to the amount of intangible 11        expenses and costs otherwise allowed as a deduction in 12        computing base income, and that were paid, accrued, or 13        incurred, directly or indirectly, (i) for taxable 14        years ending on or after December 31, 2004, to a 15        foreign person who would be a member of the same 16        unitary business group but for the fact that the 17        foreign person's business activity outside the United 18        States is 80% or more of that person's total business 19        activity and (ii) for taxable years ending on or after 20        December 31, 2008, to a person who would be a member of 21        the same unitary business group but for the fact that 22        the person is prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) 23        from being included in the unitary business group 24        because he or she is ordinarily required to apportion 25        business income under different subsections of Section 26        304. The addition modification required by this   HB3310- 87 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        subparagraph shall be reduced to the extent that 2        dividends were included in base income of the unitary 3        group for the same taxable year and received by the 4        taxpayer or by a member of the taxpayer's unitary 5        business group (including amounts included in gross 6        income pursuant to Sections 951 through 964 of the 7        Internal Revenue Code and amounts included in gross 8        income under Section 78 of the Internal Revenue Code) 9        with respect to the stock of the same person to whom 10        the intangible expenses and costs were directly or 11        indirectly paid, incurred or accrued. The preceding 12        sentence shall not apply to the extent that the same 13        dividends caused a reduction to the addition 14        modification required under Section 203(d)(2)(D-7) of 15        this Act. As used in this subparagraph, the term 16        "intangible expenses and costs" includes (1) expenses, 17        losses, and costs for, or related to, the direct or 18        indirect acquisition, use, maintenance or management, 19        ownership, sale, exchange, or any other disposition of 20        intangible property; (2) losses incurred, directly or 21        indirectly, from factoring transactions or discounting 22        transactions; (3) royalty, patent, technical, and 23        copyright fees; (4) licensing fees; and (5) other 24        similar expenses and costs. For purposes of this 25        subparagraph, "intangible property" includes patents, 26        patent applications, trade names, trademarks, service   HB3310- 88 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        marks, copyrights, mask works, trade secrets, and 2        similar types of intangible assets;3            This paragraph shall not apply to the following:4                (i) any item of intangible expenses or costs 5            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 6            indirectly, from a transaction with a person who 7            is subject in a foreign country or state, other 8            than a state which requires mandatory unitary 9            reporting, to a tax on or measured by net income 10            with respect to such item; or11                (ii) any item of intangible expense or cost 12            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 13            indirectly, if the taxpayer can establish, based 14            on a preponderance of the evidence, both of the 15            following:16                    (a) the person during the same taxable 17                year paid, accrued, or incurred, the 18                intangible expense or cost to a person that is 19                not a related member, and20                    (b) the transaction giving rise to the 21                intangible expense or cost between the 22                taxpayer and the person did not have as a 23                principal purpose the avoidance of Illinois 24                income tax, and is paid pursuant to a contract 25                or agreement that reflects arm's-length terms; 26                or  HB3310- 89 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                (iii) any item of intangible expense or cost 2            paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or 3            indirectly, from a transaction with a person if 4            the taxpayer establishes by clear and convincing 5            evidence, that the adjustments are unreasonable; 6            or if the taxpayer and the Director agree in 7            writing to the application or use of an 8            alternative method of apportionment under Section 9            304(f); 10                Nothing in this subsection shall preclude the 11            Director from making any other adjustment 12            otherwise allowed under Section 404 of this Act 13            for any tax year beginning after the effective 14            date of this amendment provided such adjustment is 15            made pursuant to regulation adopted by the 16            Department and such regulations provide methods 17            and standards by which the Department will utilize 18            its authority under Section 404 of this Act; 19            (D-9) For taxable years ending on or after 20        December 31, 2008, an amount equal to the amount of 21        insurance premium expenses and costs otherwise allowed 22        as a deduction in computing base income, and that were 23        paid, accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to 24        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 25        business group but for the fact that the person is 26        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being   HB3310- 90 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        included in the unitary business group because he or 2        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 3        income under different subsections of Section 304. The 4        addition modification required by this subparagraph 5        shall be reduced to the extent that dividends were 6        included in base income of the unitary group for the 7        same taxable year and received by the taxpayer or by a 8        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group 9        (including amounts included in gross income under 10        Sections 951 through 964 of the Internal Revenue Code 11        and amounts included in gross income under Section 78 12        of the Internal Revenue Code) with respect to the 13        stock of the same person to whom the premiums and costs 14        were directly or indirectly paid, incurred, or 15        accrued. The preceding sentence does not apply to the 16        extent that the same dividends caused a reduction to 17        the addition modification required under Section 18        203(d)(2)(D-7) or Section 203(d)(2)(D-8) of this Act;19            (D-10) An amount equal to the credit allowable to 20        the taxpayer under Section 218(a) of this Act, 21        determined without regard to Section 218(c) of this 22        Act;23            (D-11) For taxable years ending on or after 24        December 31, 2017, an amount equal to the deduction 25        allowed under Section 199 of the Internal Revenue Code 26        for the taxable year;   HB3310- 91 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (D-12) the amount that is claimed as a federal 2        deduction when computing the taxpayer's federal 3        taxable income for the taxable year and that is 4        attributable to an endowment gift for which the 5        taxpayer receives a credit under the Illinois Gives 6        Tax Credit Act; 7    and by deducting from the total so obtained the following 8    amounts:9            (E) The valuation limitation amount;10            (F) An amount equal to the amount of any tax 11        imposed by this Act which was refunded to the taxpayer 12        and included in such total for the taxable year;13            (G) An amount equal to all amounts included in 14        taxable income as modified by subparagraphs (A), (B), 15        (C) and (D) which are exempt from taxation by this 16        State either by reason of its statutes or Constitution 17        or by reason of the Constitution, treaties or statutes 18        of the United States; provided that, in the case of any 19        statute of this State that exempts income derived from 20        bonds or other obligations from the tax imposed under 21        this Act, the amount exempted shall be the interest 22        net of bond premium amortization;23            (H) Any income of the partnership which 24        constitutes personal service income as defined in 25        Section 1348(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code (as in 26        effect December 31, 1981) or a reasonable allowance   HB3310- 92 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        for compensation paid or accrued for services rendered 2        by partners to the partnership, whichever is greater; 3        this subparagraph (H) is exempt from the provisions of 4        Section 250;5            (I) An amount equal to all amounts of income 6        distributable to an entity subject to the Personal 7        Property Tax Replacement Income Tax imposed by 8        subsections (c) and (d) of Section 201 of this Act 9        including amounts distributable to organizations 10        exempt from federal income tax by reason of Section 11        501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; this subparagraph 12        (I) is exempt from the provisions of Section 250;13            (J) With the exception of any amounts subtracted 14        under subparagraph (G), an amount equal to the sum of 15        all amounts disallowed as deductions by (i) Sections 16        171(a)(2) and 265(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, 17        and all amounts of expenses allocable to interest and 18        disallowed as deductions by Section 265(a)(1) of the 19        Internal Revenue Code; and (ii) for taxable years 20        ending on or after August 13, 1999, Sections 21        171(a)(2), 265, 280C, and 832(b)(5)(B)(i) of the 22        Internal Revenue Code, plus, (iii) for taxable years 23        ending on or after December 31, 2011, Section 24        45G(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and, for 25        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, 26        any amount included in gross income under Section 87   HB3310- 93 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        of the Internal Revenue Code; the provisions of this 2        subparagraph are exempt from the provisions of Section 3        250;4            (K) An amount equal to those dividends included in 5        such total which were paid by a corporation which 6        conducts business operations in a River Edge 7        Redevelopment Zone or zones created under the River 8        Edge Redevelopment Zone Act and conducts substantially 9        all of its operations from a River Edge Redevelopment 10        Zone or zones. This subparagraph (K) is exempt from 11        the provisions of Section 250;12            (L) An amount equal to any contribution made to a 13        job training project established pursuant to the Real 14        Property Tax Increment Allocation Redevelopment Act;15            (M) An amount equal to those dividends included in 16        such total that were paid by a corporation that 17        conducts business operations in a federally designated 18        Foreign Trade Zone or Sub-Zone and that is designated 19        a High Impact Business located in Illinois; provided 20        that dividends eligible for the deduction provided in 21        subparagraph (K) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 22        shall not be eligible for the deduction provided under 23        this subparagraph (M);24            (N) An amount equal to the amount of the deduction 25        used to compute the federal income tax credit for 26        restoration of substantial amounts held under claim of   HB3310- 94 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        right for the taxable year pursuant to Section 1341 of 2        the Internal Revenue Code;3            (O) For taxable years 2001 and thereafter, for the 4        taxable year in which the bonus depreciation deduction 5        is taken on the taxpayer's federal income tax return 6        under subsection (k) of Section 168 of the Internal 7        Revenue Code and for each applicable taxable year 8        thereafter, an amount equal to "x", where:9                (1) "y" equals the amount of the depreciation 10            deduction taken for the taxable year on the 11            taxpayer's federal income tax return on property 12            for which the bonus depreciation deduction was 13            taken in any year under subsection (k) of Section 14            168 of the Internal Revenue Code, but not 15            including the bonus depreciation deduction;16                (2) for taxable years ending on or before 17            December 31, 2005, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 30 18            and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied by 19            0.429); and20                (3) for taxable years ending after December 21            31, 2005:22                    (i) for property on which a bonus 23                depreciation deduction of 30% of the adjusted 24                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 25                30 and then divided by 70 (or "y" multiplied 26                by 0.429);  HB3310- 95 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1                    (ii) for property on which a bonus 2                depreciation deduction of 50% of the adjusted 3                basis was taken, "x" equals "y" multiplied by 4                1.0;5                    (iii) for property on which a bonus 6                depreciation deduction of 100% of the adjusted 7                basis was taken in a taxable year ending on or 8                after December 31, 2021, "x" equals the 9                depreciation deduction that would be allowed 10                on that property if the taxpayer had made the 11                election under Section 168(k)(7) of the 12                Internal Revenue Code to not claim bonus 13                depreciation on that property; and14                    (iv) for property on which a bonus 15                depreciation deduction of a percentage other 16                than 30%, 50% or 100% of the adjusted basis 17                was taken in a taxable year ending on or after 18                December 31, 2021, "x" equals "y" multiplied 19                by 100 times the percentage bonus depreciation 20                on the property (that is, 100(bonus%)) and 21                then divided by 100 times 1 minus the 22                percentage bonus depreciation on the property 23                (that is, 100(1-bonus%)). 24            The aggregate amount deducted under this 25        subparagraph in all taxable years for any one piece of 26        property may not exceed the amount of the bonus   HB3310- 96 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        depreciation deduction taken on that property on the 2        taxpayer's federal income tax return under subsection 3        (k) of Section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code. This 4        subparagraph (O) is exempt from the provisions of 5        Section 250;6            (P) If the taxpayer sells, transfers, abandons, or 7        otherwise disposes of property for which the taxpayer 8        was required in any taxable year to make an addition 9        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 10        equal to that addition modification.11            If the taxpayer continues to own property through 12        the last day of the last tax year for which a 13        subtraction is allowed with respect to that property 14        under subparagraph (O) and for which the taxpayer was 15        required in any taxable year to make an addition 16        modification under subparagraph (D-5), then an amount 17        equal to that addition modification. 18            The taxpayer is allowed to take the deduction 19        under this subparagraph only once with respect to any 20        one piece of property.21            This subparagraph (P) is exempt from the 22        provisions of Section 250;23            (Q) The amount of (i) any interest income (net of 24        the deductions allocable thereto) taken into account 25        for the taxable year with respect to a transaction 26        with a taxpayer that is required to make an addition   HB3310- 97 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        modification with respect to such transaction under 2        Section 203(a)(2)(D-17), 203(b)(2)(E-12), 3        203(c)(2)(G-12), or 203(d)(2)(D-7), but not to exceed 4        the amount of such addition modification and (ii) any 5        income from intangible property (net of the deductions 6        allocable thereto) taken into account for the taxable 7        year with respect to a transaction with a taxpayer 8        that is required to make an addition modification with 9        respect to such transaction under Section 10        203(a)(2)(D-18), 203(b)(2)(E-13), 203(c)(2)(G-13), or 11        203(d)(2)(D-8), but not to exceed the amount of such 12        addition modification. This subparagraph (Q) is exempt 13        from Section 250; 14            (R) An amount equal to the interest income taken 15        into account for the taxable year (net of the 16        deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 17        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 18        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 19        for the fact that the foreign person's business 20        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 21        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 22        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 23        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 24        business group but for the fact that the person is 25        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 26        included in the unitary business group because he or   HB3310- 98 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 2        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 3        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 4        made for the same taxable year under Section 5        203(d)(2)(D-7) for interest paid, accrued, or 6        incurred, directly or indirectly, to the same person. 7        This subparagraph (R) is exempt from Section 250; 8            (S) An amount equal to the income from intangible 9        property taken into account for the taxable year (net 10        of the deductions allocable thereto) with respect to 11        transactions with (i) a foreign person who would be a 12        member of the taxpayer's unitary business group but 13        for the fact that the foreign person's business 14        activity outside the United States is 80% or more of 15        that person's total business activity and (ii) for 16        taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2008, to 17        a person who would be a member of the same unitary 18        business group but for the fact that the person is 19        prohibited under Section 1501(a)(27) from being 20        included in the unitary business group because he or 21        she is ordinarily required to apportion business 22        income under different subsections of Section 304, but 23        not to exceed the addition modification required to be 24        made for the same taxable year under Section 25        203(d)(2)(D-8) for intangible expenses and costs paid, 26        accrued, or incurred, directly or indirectly, to the   HB3310- 99 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        same person. This subparagraph (S) is exempt from 2        Section 250; 3            (T) For taxable years ending on or after December 4        31, 2011, in the case of a taxpayer who was required to 5        add back any insurance premiums under Section 6        203(d)(2)(D-9), such taxpayer may elect to subtract 7        that part of a reimbursement received from the 8        insurance company equal to the amount of the expense 9        or loss (including expenses incurred by the insurance 10        company) that would have been taken into account as a 11        deduction for federal income tax purposes if the 12        expense or loss had been uninsured. If a taxpayer 13        makes the election provided for by this subparagraph 14        (T), the insurer to which the premiums were paid must 15        add back to income the amount subtracted by the 16        taxpayer pursuant to this subparagraph (T). This 17        subparagraph (T) is exempt from the provisions of 18        Section 250; and 19            (U) For taxable years beginning on or after 20        January 1, 2023, for any cannabis establishment 21        operating in this State and licensed under the 22        Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or any cannabis 23        cultivation center or medical cannabis dispensing 24        organization operating in this State and licensed 25        under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 26        Program Act, an amount equal to the deductions that   HB3310- 100 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        were disallowed under Section 280E of the Internal 2        Revenue Code for the taxable year and that would not be 3        added back under this subsection. The provisions of 4        this subparagraph (U) are exempt from the provisions 5        of Section 250; and . 6            (NN) For taxable years beginning on or after 7        January 1, 2026, if the taxpayer is a privately owned 8        childcare center, 100% of the property taxes paid by 9        the taxpayer during the taxable year on childcare 10        center property.  11    (e) Gross income; adjusted gross income; taxable income.12        (1) In general. Subject to the provisions of paragraph 13    (2) and subsection (b)(3), for purposes of this Section 14    and Section 803(e), a taxpayer's gross income, adjusted 15    gross income, or taxable income for the taxable year shall 16    mean the amount of gross income, adjusted gross income or 17    taxable income properly reportable for federal income tax 18    purposes for the taxable year under the provisions of the 19    Internal Revenue Code. Taxable income may be less than 20    zero. However, for taxable years ending on or after 21    December 31, 1986, net operating loss carryforwards from 22    taxable years ending prior to December 31, 1986, may not 23    exceed the sum of federal taxable income for the taxable 24    year before net operating loss deduction, plus the excess 25    of addition modifications over subtraction modifications   HB3310- 101 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1    for the taxable year. For taxable years ending prior to 2    December 31, 1986, taxable income may never be an amount 3    in excess of the net operating loss for the taxable year as 4    defined in subsections (c) and (d) of Section 172 of the 5    Internal Revenue Code, provided that when taxable income 6    of a corporation (other than a Subchapter S corporation), 7    trust, or estate is less than zero and addition 8    modifications, other than those provided by subparagraph 9    (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) for corporations or 10    subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) for 11    trusts and estates, exceed subtraction modifications, an 12    addition modification must be made under those 13    subparagraphs for any other taxable year to which the 14    taxable income less than zero (net operating loss) is 15    applied under Section 172 of the Internal Revenue Code or 16    under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of this subsection 17    (e) applied in conjunction with Section 172 of the 18    Internal Revenue Code.19        (2) Special rule. For purposes of paragraph (1) of 20    this subsection, the taxable income properly reportable 21    for federal income tax purposes shall mean:22            (A) Certain life insurance companies. In the case 23        of a life insurance company subject to the tax imposed 24        by Section 801 of the Internal Revenue Code, life 25        insurance company taxable income, plus the amount of 26        distribution from pre-1984 policyholder surplus   HB3310- 102 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        accounts as calculated under Section 815a of the 2        Internal Revenue Code;3            (B) Certain other insurance companies. In the case 4        of mutual insurance companies subject to the tax 5        imposed by Section 831 of the Internal Revenue Code, 6        insurance company taxable income;7            (C) Regulated investment companies. In the case of 8        a regulated investment company subject to the tax 9        imposed by Section 852 of the Internal Revenue Code, 10        investment company taxable income;11            (D) Real estate investment trusts. In the case of 12        a real estate investment trust subject to the tax 13        imposed by Section 857 of the Internal Revenue Code, 14        real estate investment trust taxable income;15            (E) Consolidated corporations. In the case of a 16        corporation which is a member of an affiliated group 17        of corporations filing a consolidated income tax 18        return for the taxable year for federal income tax 19        purposes, taxable income determined as if such 20        corporation had filed a separate return for federal 21        income tax purposes for the taxable year and each 22        preceding taxable year for which it was a member of an 23        affiliated group. For purposes of this subparagraph, 24        the taxpayer's separate taxable income shall be 25        determined as if the election provided by Section 26        243(b)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code had been in   HB3310- 103 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        effect for all such years;2            (F) Cooperatives. In the case of a cooperative 3        corporation or association, the taxable income of such 4        organization determined in accordance with the 5        provisions of Section 1381 through 1388 of the 6        Internal Revenue Code, but without regard to the 7        prohibition against offsetting losses from patronage 8        activities against income from nonpatronage 9        activities; except that a cooperative corporation or 10        association may make an election to follow its federal 11        income tax treatment of patronage losses and 12        nonpatronage losses. In the event such election is 13        made, such losses shall be computed and carried over 14        in a manner consistent with subsection (a) of Section 15        207 of this Act and apportioned by the apportionment 16        factor reported by the cooperative on its Illinois 17        income tax return filed for the taxable year in which 18        the losses are incurred. The election shall be 19        effective for all taxable years with original returns 20        due on or after the date of the election. In addition, 21        the cooperative may file an amended return or returns, 22        as allowed under this Act, to provide that the 23        election shall be effective for losses incurred or 24        carried forward for taxable years occurring prior to 25        the date of the election. Once made, the election may 26        only be revoked upon approval of the Director. The   HB3310- 104 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        Department shall adopt rules setting forth 2        requirements for documenting the elections and any 3        resulting Illinois net loss and the standards to be 4        used by the Director in evaluating requests to revoke 5        elections. Public Act 96-932 is declaratory of 6        existing law; 7            (G) Subchapter S corporations. In the case of: (i) 8        a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 9        effect an election for the taxable year under Section 10        1362 of the Internal Revenue Code, the taxable income 11        of such corporation determined in accordance with 12        Section 1363(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, except 13        that taxable income shall take into account those 14        items which are required by Section 1363(b)(1) of the 15        Internal Revenue Code to be separately stated; and 16        (ii) a Subchapter S corporation for which there is in 17        effect a federal election to opt out of the provisions 18        of the Subchapter S Revision Act of 1982 and have 19        applied instead the prior federal Subchapter S rules 20        as in effect on July 1, 1982, the taxable income of 21        such corporation determined in accordance with the 22        federal Subchapter S rules as in effect on July 1, 23        1982; and24            (H) Partnerships. In the case of a partnership, 25        taxable income determined in accordance with Section 26        703 of the Internal Revenue Code, except that taxable   HB3310- 105 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1        income shall take into account those items which are 2        required by Section 703(a)(1) to be separately stated 3        but which would be taken into account by an individual 4        in calculating his taxable income.5        (3) Recapture of business expenses on disposition of 6    asset or business. Notwithstanding any other law to the 7    contrary, if in prior years income from an asset or 8    business has been classified as business income and in a 9    later year is demonstrated to be non-business income, then 10    all expenses, without limitation, deducted in such later 11    year and in the 2 immediately preceding taxable years 12    related to that asset or business that generated the 13    non-business income shall be added back and recaptured as 14    business income in the year of the disposition of the 15    asset or business. Such amount shall be apportioned to 16    Illinois using the greater of the apportionment fraction 17    computed for the business under Section 304 of this Act 18    for the taxable year or the average of the apportionment 19    fractions computed for the business under Section 304 of 20    this Act for the taxable year and for the 2 immediately 21    preceding taxable years.  22    (f) Valuation limitation amount.23        (1) In general. The valuation limitation amount 24    referred to in subsections (a)(2)(G), (c)(2)(I) and 25    (d)(2)(E) is an amount equal to:  HB3310- 106 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (A) The sum of the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 2        amounts (to the extent consisting of gain reportable 3        under the provisions of Section 1245 or 1250 of the 4        Internal Revenue Code) for all property in respect of 5        which such gain was reported for the taxable year; 6        plus7            (B) The lesser of (i) the sum of the pre-August 1, 8        1969 appreciation amounts (to the extent consisting of 9        capital gain) for all property in respect of which 10        such gain was reported for federal income tax purposes 11        for the taxable year, or (ii) the net capital gain for 12        the taxable year, reduced in either case by any amount 13        of such gain included in the amount determined under 14        subsection (a)(2)(F) or (c)(2)(H).15        (2) Pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation amount.16            (A) If the fair market value of property referred 17        to in paragraph (1) was readily ascertainable on 18        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 19        amount for such property is the lesser of (i) the 20        excess of such fair market value over the taxpayer's 21        basis (for determining gain) for such property on that 22        date (determined under the Internal Revenue Code as in 23        effect on that date), or (ii) the total gain realized 24        and reportable for federal income tax purposes in 25        respect of the sale, exchange or other disposition of 26        such property.  HB3310- 107 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1            (B) If the fair market value of property referred 2        to in paragraph (1) was not readily ascertainable on 3        August 1, 1969, the pre-August 1, 1969 appreciation 4        amount for such property is that amount which bears 5        the same ratio to the total gain reported in respect of 6        the property for federal income tax purposes for the 7        taxable year, as the number of full calendar months in 8        that part of the taxpayer's holding period for the 9        property ending July 31, 1969 bears to the number of 10        full calendar months in the taxpayer's entire holding 11        period for the property.12            (C) The Department shall prescribe such 13        regulations as may be necessary to carry out the 14        purposes of this paragraph. 15    (g) Double deductions. Unless specifically provided 16otherwise, nothing in this Section shall permit the same item 17to be deducted more than once. 18    (h) Legislative intention. Except as expressly provided by 19this Section there shall be no modifications or limitations on 20the amounts of income, gain, loss or deduction taken into 21account in determining gross income, adjusted gross income or 22taxable income for federal income tax purposes for the taxable 23year, or in the amount of such items entering into the 24computation of base income and net income under this Act for   HB3310- 108 -LRB104 10872 HLH 20954 b1such taxable year, whether in respect of property values as of 2August 1, 1969 or otherwise.3(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 4102-658, eff. 8-27-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1112, eff. 512-21-22; 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-478, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, 6Article 10, Section 10-900, eff. 6-7-24; 103-592, Article 170, 7Section 170-90, eff. 6-7-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-647, 8eff. 7-1-24; revised 8-20-24.)